Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8704
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Patient Safety Improvement Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 71-8705 to 71-8709 apply.

Laws 2005, LB 361, § 4.